Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1115
Participation prohibited; violations; penalties; applicability of section.

(1) A person who knowingly permits an individual whom the person knows is younger than twenty-one years of age to participate in a game of chance is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) A person who participates in a game of chance when such person is younger than twenty-one years of age at the time of participation is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) This section does not apply (a) to a person who permits an individual who is nineteen years of age or older to participate in a keno lottery conducted in accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act at a licensed racetrack enclosure as long as such keno lottery is played in an area separate from the casino gaming floor where other games of chance are played or (b) to a person nineteen years of age or older who participates in a keno lottery conducted in accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act at a licensed racetrack enclosure as long as such keno lottery is played in an area separate from the casino gaming floor where other games of chance are played.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 39;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 39.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.